Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB296.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Beagle Freedom Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Animal testing facility." A facility, including a private entity, State agency or an institution of higher education, that confines and uses dogs or cats for research, education, testing or other scientific or medical purposes. The term shall include 1234567891011121314151617 any of the following:(1) A kennel or facility subject to the Public Health Service Policy on Humane Care and Use of Laboratory Animals provided for under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 6A (relating to public health service).(2) A kennel or facility subject to the provisions of 21 CFR Pt. 58 (relating to good laboratory practice for nonclinical laboratory studies), 21 U.S.C. Ch. 9 (relating to Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act) or 42 U.S.C. Ch. 6A.(3) A research kennel licensed under the Dog law."Dealer." A person that in the regular course of business for compensation or profit buys, sells, transfers, exchanges or barters dogs and cats. The term does not include any of the following:(1) A person that transports companion animals in the regular course of business as a common carrier.(2) A person with a primary purpose of finding permanent adoptive homes for companion animals."Department." The Department of Agriculture of the Commonwealth."Dog Law." The act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law."Kennel." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law."Police officer." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law."Releasing agency." As defined in section 901-A of the Dog Law."Research." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law."Research kennel." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law."State dog warden." As defined in section 102 of the Dog Law.20250HB0296PN0240 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Prohibition on sale of dogs and cats bred by certain persons.Notwithstanding the provisions of section 908 of the Dog Law, a dealer or kennel may not sell or offer for sale, including a sale for research purposes, a dog or cat bred by a person that has received any of the following from the United States Department of Agriculture as authorized under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals):(1) A citation for a direct or critical violation or citations for three or more indirect or noncritical violations during the two-year period before the procurement of the dog or cat.(2) Two consecutive citations for no access to a housing facility before the procurement of the dog or cat.Section 4. Duty of persons, kennels and animal testing facilities to offer dogs and cats for adoption.(a) Duties.--(1) If a person, kennel or animal testing facility specified under paragraph (2) does not have a need for a dog or cat in its possession and the dog or cat does not pose a health or safety risk to the public or the welfare of the dog or cat, the person, kennel or animal testing facility shall offer for release the dog or cat to a releasing agency for eventual adoption or for adoption through a private placement. In the case of an animal testing facility operated by a State agency or an institution of higher education, the animal testing facility may develop its own adoption program.(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply only to the following:(i) A person that raises cats regulated under 20250HB0296PN0240 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal law as research animals or sells or transfers cats to an animal testing facility.(ii) A kennel that breeds dogs regulated under Federal law as research animals.(iii) A kennel that sells or transfers dogs to an animal testing facility or a research kennel.(iv) An animal testing facility.(3) A person, kennel or animal testing facility subject to this subsection shall keep the offer for release under paragraph (1) available for a reasonable period of time for a duration of up to 21 days before euthanizing a dog or cat specified under paragraph (1).(b) Implementation.--A person, kennel or animal testing facility under subsection (a) may enter into an agreement with a releasing agency to implement the requirements under subsection (a).(c) Liability.--A person, kennel or animal testing facility under subsection (a) shall not be liable for civil damages for a dog or cat adopted under subsection (a).(d) Annual reports.--A person, kennel or animal testing facility under subsection (a) shall annually submit a report to the department stating the number of dogs and cats adopted under subsection (a) and the name of each releasing agency utilized by the person, kennel or animal testing facility.Section 5. Recordkeeping requirements for persons and kennels engaged in the raising of dogs or cats for research purposes.(a) Requirements.--(1) A person or kennel specified under paragraph (2) and engaged in the raising of dogs or cats for research purposes 20250HB0296PN0240 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall keep accurate records of all of the following:(i) A dog or cat purchased, acquired, owned, held or otherwise in the possession or control of the person or kennel.(ii) A dog or cat transported, euthanized, sold or otherwise disposed of during the two-year period from the date of the purchase, acquisition, transfer or disposition of the dog or cat.(2) Paragraph (1) shall apply only to the following:(i) A person that raises cats regulated under Federal law as research animals or sells or transfers cats to an animal testing facility.(ii) A kennel that breeds dogs regulated under Federal law as research animals.(iii) A kennel that sells or transfers dogs to an animal testing facility or a research kennel.(b) Records.--The records under subsection (a) shall include all of the following:(1) The name and address of the person from whom a dog or cat was purchased or acquired and the person's license or registration number if the person is licensed or registered under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals).(2) The date on which a dog or cat was purchased or acquired.(3) The name and address of the person to whom a dog or cat was sold, given or transferred and the person's license or registration number if the person is licensed or registered under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54.(4) The official United States Department of 20250HB0296PN0240 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Agriculture's tag number or tattoo assigned to a dog or cat under 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54.(5) A description of a dog or cat, including all of the following:(i) The species and breed or type.(ii) The sex.(iii) The date of birth or approximate age.(iv) The color and distinctive markings.(6) The date and number of offspring born of a dog or cat while in the possession or under the control of the person or kennel.(7) Medical care and vaccinations provided to a dog or cat.(8) The date and method of disposition of a dog or cat, including the sale, death and cause of death of the dog or cat if the disposition is not euthanasia, adoption or transfer.(9) The number of dogs or cats in the possession of the person or kennel that the person or kennel does not need.(10) The number of dogs or cats described under paragraph (9) that have been offered for transfer to a releasing agency for eventual adoption or for adoption through private placement.(c) Inspections.--A person or kennel subject to subsection (a) shall ensure that the records under subsection (a) are legible and the records shall be open to inspection and may be copied by an employee of the department, State dog warden or police officer.(d) Submission.--A person or kennel subject to subsection (a) shall annually submit a summary of the records under 20250HB0296PN0240 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a) to the department in a form determined by the department.Section 6. Whistleblower protection.An employee of a person, dealer, kennel, animal testing facility, private entity, State agency or institution of higher education subject to this act shall be deemed to be an employee under the act of December 12, 1986 (P.L.1559, No.169), known as the Whistleblower Law, with regard to a good faith report of a potential violation of this act, the Dog Law or 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54 (relating to transportation, sale, and handling of certain animals). A dealer, kennel, animal testing facility, private entity, State agency or institution of higher education subject to this act shall be deemed to be an employer under the Whistleblower Law with regard to a good faith report of a potential violation of this act, the Dog Law or 7 U.S.C. Ch. 54.Section 7. Annual report.No later than July 1, 2026, and each July 1 thereafter, the department shall submit a report summarizing the information collected under this act and complaints, enforcement activities and penalties authorized under this act to the following:(1) The chair and minority chair of the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the Senate.(2) The chair and minority chair of the Agriculture and Rural Affairs Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 8. Penalties.A violation of this act shall constitute a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 9. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this act.20250HB0296PN0240 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 10. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 120 days.20250HB0296PN0240 - 8 - 12